Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.005

Legislative finding—Purpose.

The legislature finds that the conduct of podiatric physicians and surgeons licensed to practice in this state plays a vital role in preserving the public health and well-being. The purpose of this chapter is to establish an effective public agency to regulate the practice of podiatric medicine and surgery for the protection and promotion of the public health, safety, and welfare and to act as a disciplinary body for the licensed podiatric physicians and surgeons of this state and to ensure that only individuals who meet and maintain minimum standards of competence and conduct may obtain a license to provide podiatric services to the public.

[ 1990 c 147 s 1; 1982 c 21 s 1.]